Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 9 Drainage Districts

Cross references. —

As to exemption of property owned by drainage districts, irrigation districts, water districts or other governmental agencies in assessment and levy, in connection with water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-778

.

As to irrigation and drainage districts generally, see chapter 6 of this title.

For authority of interstates streams commissioner to examine and require the attendance of witnesses in connection with investigations of interstates streams and drainage areas, see §

41-11-203

.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, see Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

For provision prohibiting loans on credit or donations by state or any political subdivision thereof and requiring two-thirds vote of people for works of internal improvement, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 6.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

For the Wyoming Conservation Districts Law, see §§

11-16-101

through

11-16-134

.

For public health and safety relative to water, see title 35.

As to public lands generally, see title 36.

As to when county treasurers to pay over funds to treasurer of each city, town, school district, irrigation district, drainage district and county libraries, see §

39-13-111

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).